Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.710.360

Professional development.

RCW 28A.343.100 and 28A.415.445 govern school operation and management under RCW 28A.710.040 and apply to charter schools established under chapter 28A.710 RCW [this chapter].

[ 2021 c 197 s 9.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2021 c 197: See note following RCW 28A.415.443.